Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1612.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; AGGREGATE RESOURCE INVENTORY.new text end new text begin $250,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the environment and natural resources trust fund to the commissioner of natural resources for the aggregate resource mapping program to update Information Circular 46, Aggregate Resources Inventory of the Seven-County Metropolitan Area, Minnesota (Minnesota Geological Survey 2000), with particular emphasis on projected needs and the estimated time until the aggregate resource is exhausted, and to perform duties under Minnesota Statutes, section 84.94. new text end